Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.452

Interest arbitration panel a state agency.

An interest arbitration panel created pursuant to RCW 41.56.450, in the performance of its duties under chapter 41.56 RCW, exercises a state function and is, for the purposes of this chapter, a state agency. Chapter 34.05 RCW does not apply to proceedings before an interest arbitration panel under this chapter.

[ 1983 c 287 s 3; 1980 c 87 s 19.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 287: See note following RCW 41.56.450.